incubator/tools/apertium-lex-acquisition/apertium-en-pt.pt.dix
	 <pardef n="/em__pr">
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>em</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="RL">
			 <p>
				 <l><a/>em</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>no</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nos</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>na</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>num</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>um<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nuns</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>um<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>numa</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>um<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>numas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>um<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>neste</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nestes</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesta</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nestas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesse</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesses</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nessa</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nessas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naquele</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naqueles</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naquela</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naquelas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>neste</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nestes</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesta</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nestas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>este<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesse</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nesses</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nessa</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nessas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>esse<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naqui</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aqui<s n="adv"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>naquilo</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>aquilo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nisso</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>isso<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nisto</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>isto<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nele</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>ele<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>neles</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>ele<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nela</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>ele<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>nelas</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/>ele<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_meu__det"/>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_nosso__det"/>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_seu__det"/>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_teu__det"/>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_vosso__det"/>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_qual__rel"/>
		 </e>
	<!--	 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>n</l>
				 <r>em<s n="pr"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="/o_que__rel"/>
		 </e>-->
	 </pardef>
	 
	 <pardef n="/a__pr">
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>a</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="RL">
			 <p>
				 <l><a/>a</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquele</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àqueles</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquela</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquelas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquilo</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquilo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>minhas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>minha</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>meus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>meu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>nossas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>nossa</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>nossos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>nosso</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>suas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>sua</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>seus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>seu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>tuas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>tua</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>teus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>teu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>vossas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>vossa</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>vossos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>vosso</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>quais</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>qual</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>quais</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>qual</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
<!--		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>-->
	 </pardef>
  </pardefs>
